Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.415.445

Professional learning days—Mental health topics—Cultural competency, diversity, equity, and inclusion.

(1) Beginning in the 2020-21 school year, and every other school year thereafter, school districts must use one of the professional learning days funded under RCW 28A.150.415 to train school district staff in one or more of the following topics: Social-emotional learning, trauma-informed practices, using the model plan developed under RCW 28A.320.1271 related to recognition and response to emotional or behavioral distress, consideration of adverse childhood experiences, mental health literacy, antibullying strategies, or culturally sustaining practices.

(2)(a) In the 2021-22 school year, school districts must use one of the professional learning days funded under RCW 28A.150.415 to train school district staff in one or more of the following topics: Cultural competency, diversity, equity, or inclusion.

(b) Beginning in the 2023-24 school year, and every other school year thereafter, school districts must use one of the professional learning days funded under RCW 28A.150.415 to provide to school district staff a variety of opportunities for training, professional development, and professional learning aligned with the cultural competency, equity, diversity, and inclusion standards of practice developed by the Washington professional educator standards board under RCW 28A.410.260. Alignment with the standards of practice must be evaluated using the rubrics developed under RCW 28A.410.260. The opportunities must also include training on multicultural education and principles of English language acquisition.

(3) For the purposes of this section:

(a) "Cultural competency," "diversity," "equity," and "inclusion" have the same meaning as in RCW 28A.415.443.

(b) "School district staff" includes classified staff, certificated instructional staff, certificated administrative staff, and superintendents.

[ 2021 c 197 s 8; 2019 c 360 s 3.]

NOTES:

Finding—Intent—2021 c 197: See note following RCW 28A.415.443.

Findings—Intent—2019 c 360: See note following RCW 74.09.4951.